Nebraska, session 109, LB890.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-3003, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3003 (1) Any distributor shall be required to procure a biennial
license from the Tax Commissioner permitting him or her to place and
either directly or indirectly control or manage a mechanical amusement
device within the State of Nebraska. The Tax Commissioner, upon the
application of any person, may issue a license, subject to the same
limitations as an operator's license under section 77-3002. If the
applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's
social security number.
(2)(a) Except for an applicant that holds a liquor license under the
Nebraska Liquor Control Act, an applicant for or person holding a license
as a distributor of a cash device shall be subject to a background check
at any time by the department including fingerprinting and a check of his
or her criminal history record information maintained by the
Identification Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation through
the Nebraska State Patrol for the purpose of determining whether the
Department of Revenue has a basis to deny the license application or to
suspend, cancel, revoke, or terminate the person's license. Each
applicant for or person holding a license pursuant to this section shall
also submit a personal history report to the department on a form
provided by the department and may be subject to a background
investigation, an inspection of the applicant's or licensee's facilities,
or both. An applicant or licensee shall pay the costs associated with the
background check along with any required fees as determined by the
department.
(b) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to deny any application
for a license as a distributor of a cash device for cause. Cause for
denial of a license application includes instances in which the applicant
individually, or in the case of a business entity, any officer, director,
employee, or limited liability company member of the applicant or
-2-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
licensee other than an employee whose duties are purely ministerial in
nature:
(i) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations,
or duties imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(ii) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another to
cause any person to violate any of the provisions of the act or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(iii) Obtained a license or permit under the act by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(iv) Has been convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a
felony or a misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft,
willful failure to make required payments or reports, or filing false
reports with a governmental agency at any level;
(v) Denied the department or its authorized representatives,
including authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where
activity required to be licensed under the act is being conducted or
failed to produce for inspection or audit any book, record, document, or
item required by law, rule, or regulation;
(vi) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material
fact to the department;
(vii) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence such
applicant's qualifications to be licensed in accordance with the act;
(viii) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including
penalties and interest required by the act or any other taxes imposed
pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; or
(ix) Has been cited for a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control
Act and had a liquor license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission for illegal gambling activities on or
about the premises licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska
-3-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
Liquor Control Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to such act.
(c) No renewal of a license issued pursuant to this section shall be
issued when the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license
upon a first application.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2025, the biennial license for a
distributor of a cash device shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred
dollars per cash device up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars. The
Department of Revenue shall remit all license fees collected by the
department pursuant to this section to the State Treasurer for credit to
the Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.
(4) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke the
license of any distributor that is in violation of the Mechanical
Amusement Device Tax Act.
(5) Beginning on the implementation date designated by the Tax
Commissioner pursuant to subsection (2) of section 9-1312, prior to the
winnings payment of any cash device winnings as defined in section
9-1303, a distributor of a cash device shall check the collection system
to determine if the winner has a debt or an outstanding state liability
as required by the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. If
such distributor determines that the winner is subject to the collection
system, the distributor shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding
state liability identified in the collection system from the winnings
payment and shall remit the net winnings payment of cash device winnings,
if any, to the winner and the amount deducted to the Department of
Revenue to be credited against such debt or outstanding state liability
as provided in section 9-1306.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3003.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3003.01 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner or his or her agents or
employees, at the direction of the Tax Commissioner, or any peace officer
-4-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
of this state may seize, without a warrant, any mechanical amusement
device if there is cause to believe such mechanical amusement device is
not in compliance with the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act or if the
department determines the response to a request for information is
materially deficient without good cause. In addition to seizure, any
person placing in service or operating a cash device constituting an
illegal game of chance or an unlicensed cash device of any kind within
this state shall be subject to a penalty of up to one thousand dollars
for each day of such operation. The Tax Commissioner has the authority to
suspend or revoke the license of any operator, manufacturer, or
distributor of a cash device that is in violation of this section.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, a mechanical amusement device
is subject to seizure and penalties as if it were a game of chance if:
(i) The mechanical amusement device is a cash device; and
(ii) The mechanical amusement device does not bear an unexpired
decal as required under the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.
(c) This section does not apply to any device (i) used in any bingo,
lottery by the sale of pickle cards, or other lottery, raffle, or gift
enterprise conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Bingo Act, Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act, Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, Nebraska
Pickle Card Lottery Act, Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, State
Lottery Act, or section 9-701, (ii) used for a prize contest as defined
in section 28-1101, (iii) specifically authorized by the laws of this
state, or (iv) regulated under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.
(2) To receive a determination from the department that a cash
device is in compliance with the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and
any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, a
manufacturer or distributor of the device shall:
(a) Submit an application to the Tax Commissioner containing
information regarding the device's location, software, Internet
-5-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
connectivity, and configuration as may be required by the Tax
Commissioner;
(b)(i) (b) Submit an application fee as provided in subdivision (b)
(ii) of this subsection. of five hundred dollars;
(ii) The application fee shall be:
(A) Five hundred dollars prior to January 1, 2027;
(B) Six hundred fifty dollars beginning January 1, 2027, and prior
to January 1, 2028; and
(C) Beginning January 1, 2028, and January 1 of each year
thereafter, the fee from the prior calendar year adjusted for inflation
by the department using a formula tied to the Producer Price Index for
all commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics. After applying the formula, the Department of
Revenue shall round the adjusted figure to the nearest number divisible
by fifty and set such figure as the application fee;
(c) Provide a specimen of the proposed cash device;
(d) Provide all supporting evidence, including a report by an
independent testing laboratory certified by the Tax Commissioner, to the
Tax Commissioner indicating that, under all configurations, settings, and
modes of operation, operation of the cash device constitutes a game of
skill and not a game of chance and the use, operation, sale, or
manufacture of the cash device would not constitute a violation of
section 28-1107; and
(e) Provide an affidavit from the manufacturer or distributor
affirming that no functional changes in hardware or software will be made
to the approved cash device without further approval from the Tax
Commissioner.
(3) The Tax Commissioner shall issue a response in writing to the
applicant within forty-five days after the applicant has completed and
submitted all application requirements. The Tax Commissioner's response
shall state the reason for any denial or the reasons a determination
-6-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
cannot be made.
(4)(a) A cash device shall not be considered a game of skill if one
or more of the following apply:
(i) The ability of any player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device is impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior
losses of players playing such cash device;
(ii) The ability of the player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device is impacted by the ability of any person to set a specified
win-loss ratio for the cash device or by the cash device having a
predetermined win-loss percentage;
(iii) The outcome of the game played on the cash device can be
controlled by a source other than any player playing the cash device;
(iv) The success of any player is or may be determined by a chance
event which cannot be altered by player action;
(v) There is no possibility for the player to win every game played
on the cash device or there are unwinnable games or game modes on the
cash device;
(vi) The ability of any player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device requires the exercise of skill that no reasonable player
could exercise; or
(vii) The primary determination of the prize amount is determined by
the presentation or generation of a particular puzzle or group of symbols
dealt to the player and the player does not have control over the puzzle
or group of symbols presented.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, reasonable player means a
player with an average level of intelligence, physical and mental skills,
reaction time, and dexterity.
(5) The department or any court considering whether a gambling
device is a game of skill may consider:
(a) The results of an analysis by the independent testing laboratory
certified by the Tax Commissioner to evaluate the reaction time required
-7-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
for a player of a particular game on such cash device to perform the
tasks required by the game to win; or
(b) The results of an analysis by the independent testing laboratory
certified by the Tax Commissioner to evaluate factors set forth by the
Tax Commissioner, other than reaction time, required for the player of a
particular game on such cash device to perform the tasks required by the
game to win.
(6) Factors which are not sufficient indications of a skill-based
game include, but are not limited to:
(a) Whether a comprehensive list of prizes or outcomes is offered to
the player or whether all outcomes are drawn from a finite pool of
predetermined outcomes or starting positions;
(b) Whether a player can increase his or her chance of winning based
on knowledge of probabilities in general or the probabilities of any
particular prize or outcome in a game or on a cash device;
(c) Whether a player can simply choose not to play before committing
money or credits; or
(d) A game task consisting solely of moving a symbol up or down,
replacing one symbol with another, or any similar action, with or without
a timer.
(7) Upon approval of an application based on a determination that
the mechanical amusement device is a game of skill and not a game of
chance, the Tax Commissioner shall issue a mechanical amusement device
decal for the device as configured and as provided in subsection (8) of
this section. No mechanical amusement device decal shall be issued for
any cash device unless the department has determined that such cash
device is a game of skill and not a game of chance and that the
manufacture, sale, transport, placement, possession, or operation of such
cash device does not constitute a violation of section 28-1107. If the
Tax Commissioner does not approve the application for the cash device,
the application shall be denied and the operator shall have the
-8-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
opportunity for an administrative hearing before the Tax Commissioner at
which evidence may be presented on the issue of whether the cash device
is specifically authorized by law and is not a gambling device as defined
in section 28-1101. After such hearing, the Tax Commissioner shall enter
a final decision approving or denying the application. The Tax
Commissioner's final decision may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(8)(a) Upon approval of a specimen of a cash device as a game of
skill under this section, the department may issue a mechanical amusement
device decal for each such cash device:
(i) If certified by the manufacturer to be functionally identical in
both hardware and software configurations to the specimen provided to the
department; and
(ii) If the application fee described in subdivision (2)(b) of this
section and the annual decal fee described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection have been paid.
(b)(i) In order for a distributor or operator of a cash device to
place a cash device into operation at a retail establishment, other than
a retail establishment owned or operated by a fraternal benefit society
organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 or a
recognized veterans organization as defined in section 80-401.01, such
retail establishment shall generate at least sixty percent of the gross
operating revenue of such retail establishment from sources other than
the total gross operating revenue of any cash devices located within the
retail establishment.
(ii) The number of cash devices permitted at any retail
establishment shall not exceed the lesser of either:
(A) Except for a fraternal benefit society organized and licensed
under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization
as defined in section 80-401.01, the number of cash devices it takes to
generate forty percent of the gross operating revenue of the retail
-9-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
establishment; or
(B) Four cash devices, except that an establishment with over four
thousand square feet may have one cash device for each one thousand
square feet, up to a maximum of fifteen cash devices.
(c)(i) (c) The distributor or operator of a cash device shall pay an
annual decal fee as provided in subdivision (c)(ii) of this subsection of
two hundred fifty dollars to the department for each cash device in
operation in Nebraska. The decal issued under this section shall be
distinct from other decals issued by the department for mechanical
amusement devices that are not required to be evaluated under this
section. Regardless of the issuance of a decal by the department, no cash
device shall be considered in compliance if it does not bear an unexpired
decal in a conspicuous place.
(ii) For each cash device in operation in Nebraska the annual decal
fee shall be:
(A) Two hundred fifty dollars prior to January 1, 2027;
(B) Three hundred fifty dollars beginning January 1, 2027, and prior
to January 1, 2028; and
(C) Beginning January 1, 2028, and January 1 of each year
thereafter, the fee from the prior calendar year adjusted for inflation
by the department using a formula tied to the Producer Price Index for
all commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics. After applying the formula, the Department of
Revenue shall round the adjusted figure to the nearest number divisible
by fifty and set such figure as the annual decal fee.
(9) The application process described in this section shall not be
construed to limit further investigation by the department or the
issuance of further regulations to promote compliance after the
application process is completed. At any point after a determination of
skill by the department, the department may request from the
manufacturer, distributor, or operator information about any cash device
-10-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
in operation in this state, including, but not limited to, information
regarding currently operable source code, changes to software or
hardware, and communications from or to the device over the Internet. A
manufacturer, distributor, or operator that receives a request shall
respond with all responsive information in its possession or control
within fifteen business days.
(10) If a manufacturer or distributor receives a determination from
the department that a cash device is not in compliance with the
Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, such manufacturer or distributor
shall have thirty days after the issuance of that determination to remove
any such cash device from operation in Nebraska.
(11) Application fees collected under subsection (2) of this section
and annual decal fees collected under subsection (8) of this section
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of
Revenue Enforcement Fund.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3003.03, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
77-3003.03 (1) A manufacturer of a cash device shall be required to
procure a biennial license from the Tax Commissioner permitting such
manufacturer to place any cash devices in the State of Nebraska for sale,
lease, or distribution through a third party. The Tax Commissioner, upon
the application of any person, may issue a license subject to the same
limitations as an operator's license under section 77-3002. If the
applicant is an individual, the application shall include the applicant's
social security number. The license fee for a manufacturer of a cash
device shall be ten thousand dollars. The Department of Revenue shall
remit all license fees collected by the department pursuant to this
section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Revenue
Enforcement Fund.
(2)(a) Each applicant for or person holding a license as a
manufacturer of a cash device shall be subject to a background check at
-11-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
any time by the department including fingerprinting and a check of his or
her criminal history record information maintained by the Identification
Division of the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska
State Patrol for the purpose of determining whether the Department of
Revenue has a basis to deny the license application or to suspend,
cancel, revoke, or terminate the person's license. Each applicant for or
person holding a license pursuant to this section shall also submit a
personal history report to the department on a form provided by the
department and may be subject to a background investigation, an
inspection of the applicant's or licensee's facilities, or both. An
applicant or licensee shall pay the costs associated with the background
check and any required fees as determined by the department.
(b) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to deny a license for a
manufacturer of a cash device for cause. Cause for denial of a license
application includes instances in which the applicant individually, or in
the case of a business entity, any officer, director, employee, or
limited liability company member of the applicant or licensee other than
an employee whose duties are purely ministerial in nature:
(i) Violated the provisions, requirements, conditions, limitations,
or duties imposed by the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(ii) Knowingly caused, aided, abetted, or conspired with another to
cause any person to violate any of the provisions of the act or any rules
or regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the act;
(iii) Obtained a license or permit under the act by fraud,
misrepresentation, or concealment;
(iv) Has been convicted of, forfeited bond upon a charge of, or
pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to any offense or crime, whether a
felony or a misdemeanor, involving any gambling activity or fraud, theft,
willful failure to make required payments or reports, or filing false
reports with a governmental agency at any level;
-12-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
(v) Denied the department or its authorized representatives,
including authorized law enforcement agencies, access to any place where
activity required to be licensed under the act is being conducted or
failed to produce for inspection or audit any book, record, document, or
item required by law, rule, or regulation;
(vi) Made a misrepresentation of or failed to disclose a material
fact to the department;
(vii) Failed to prove by clear and convincing evidence such
applicant's qualifications to be licensed in accordance with the act;
(viii) Failed to pay any taxes and additions to taxes, including
penalties and interest required by the act or any other taxes imposed
pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967; or
(ix) Has been cited for a violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control
Act and had a liquor license suspended, canceled, or revoked by the
Nebraska Liquor Control Commission for illegal gambling activities on or
about the premises licensed by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska
Liquor Control Act or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
pursuant to such act.
(c) No renewal of a license pursuant to this section shall be issued
when the applicant for renewal would not be eligible for a license upon a
first application.
(3) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke the
license of any manufacturer of a cash device that is in violation of the
Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.
Sec. 4. Section 77-3004, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3004 (1) An occupation tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the
amount and in accordance with the terms and conditions stated in this
section, upon the business of operating mechanical amusement devices that
are not cash devices within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain
either directly or indirectly received. Every person who now or hereafter
-13-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
engages in the business of operating such mechanical amusement devices
that are not cash devices in the State of Nebraska shall pay such
occupation tax in the amount and manner specified in this section.
(2) Any distributor or operator of a mechanical amusement device
that is not a cash device within the State of Nebraska shall pay an
occupation tax for each such mechanical amusement device which he or she
places into operation during all of the taxable year. The occupation tax
shall be due and payable on January 1 of each year on each mechanical
amusement device that is not a cash device in operation on that date,
except that it shall be unlawful to pay any such occupation tax unless
the sales or use tax has been paid on such mechanical amusement devices.
For every mechanical amusement device that is not a cash device put into
operation on a date subsequent to January 1, and which has not been
included in computing the occupation tax imposed and levied by the
Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, the occupation tax shall be due and
payable therefor prior to the time the mechanical amusement device is
placed in operation. All occupation taxes collected pursuant to the act
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.
(3) The amount of the occupation tax for each mechanical amusement
device that is not a cash device shall be:
(a) Thirty-five thirty-five dollars for each mechanical amusement
device that is not a cash device for any period beginning on or after
January 1, 2000, and prior to January 1, 2027, except that for such
mechanical amusement devices placed in operation after July 1, and before
January 1 of any such each year, the occupation tax shall be twenty
dollars for each mechanical amusement device; .
(b) For calendar year 2027, seventy dollars; and
(c) For calendar year 2028 and each calendar year thereafter, the
occupation tax from the prior calendar year adjusted for inflation by the
department using a formula tied to the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
-14-

LB890 LB890
2026 2026
of Labor Statistics. After applying the formula, the Department of
Revenue shall round the adjusted figure to the nearest number divisible
by five.
(4) The occupation taxes collected pursuant to this section shall be
remitted to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Twenty percent of such amount to the Department of Revenue
Enforcement Fund; and
(b) Eighty percent of such amount to the General Fund.
Sec. 5. Original sections 77-3003.01 and 77-3004, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 77-3003 and 77-3003.03, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-15-